North Carolina, session 2025, SB1029.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 105-164.3 is amended by adding two new subdivisions to read:
"(88) Feminine hygiene products. – Tampons, panty liners, menstrual cups, sanitary
napkins, and other similar tangible personal property designed for feminine
hygiene in connection with the human menstrual cycle but does not include
"grooming and hygiene products."
…
(94) Grooming and hygiene products. – Soaps and cleaning solutions, shampoo,
toothpaste, mouthwash, antiperspirants, suntan lotions, and sunscreens,
regardless of whether the items meet the definition of "over-the-counter
drugs.""
SECTION 2. G.S. 105-164.13 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-164.13. Retail sales and use tax.
…
(13d) Sales of children or adult diapers or incontinence underpads on prescription
by an enrolled State Medicaid/Health Choice provider for use by beneficiaries
of the State Medicaid program when the provider is reimbursed by the State
Medicaid program or a Medicaid managed care organization, as defined in 42
U.S.C. § 1396b(m).underpads.
(13e) Feminine hygiene products.
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 105-164.13B reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-164.13B. Food exempt from tax.
(a) State Exemption. – Food is exempt from the taxes imposed by this Article unless the
food is included in one of the subdivisions in this subsection. The following food items are
subject to tax:
(1) Repealed by Session Laws 2005-276, s. 33.10, effective October 1, 2005.
(2) Dietary supplements.
(3) Food sold through a vending machine.
(4) Prepared food, other than bakery items sold without eating utensils by an
artisan bakery. The term "bakery item" includes bread, rolls, buns, biscuits,
bagels, croissants, pastries, donuts, danish, cakes, tortes, pies, tarts, muffins,
*S1029-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
bars, cookies, and tortillas. An artisan bakery is a bakery that meets all of the
following requirements:
a. It derives over eighty percent (80%) of its gross receipts from bakery
items.
b. Its annual gross receipts, combined with the gross receipts of all
related persons, do not exceed one million eight hundred thousand
dollars ($1,800,000). For purposes of this subdivision, the term
"related person" means a person described in one of the relationships
set forth in section 267(b) or 707(b) of the Code.
(5) Soft drinks.
(6) Repealed by Session Laws 2003-284, s. 45.6B, effective January 1, 2004.
(7) Candy.
(b) Administration of Local Food Tax. – The Secretary must administer local sales and
use taxes imposed on food as if they were imposed under this Article. This applies to local taxes
on food imposed under Subchapter VIII of this Chapter and under Chapter 1096 of the 1967
Session Laws."
SECTION 4. G.S. 105-467 reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-467. Scope of sales tax.
(a) Sales Tax. – The sales tax that may be imposed under this Article is limited to a tax
at the rate of one percent (1%) of the following:
…
(5) The sales price of food that is not otherwise exempt from tax pursuant to
G.S. 105-164.13 but is exempt from the State sales and use tax pursuant to
G.S. 105-164.13B.
(5a) The sales price of a bundled transaction that includes food subject to tax under
subdivision (5) of this subsection, if the price of the food exceeds ten percent
(10%) of the price of the bundle. A retailer must determine the price of food
in a bundled transaction in accordance with G.S. 105-164.4D.
…
(b) Exemptions and Refunds. – The State exemptions and exclusions contained in Article
5 of Subchapter I of this Chapter, except for including the exemption for food in
G.S. 105-164.13B, apply to the local sales and use tax authorized to be levied and imposed under
this Article. The State refund provisions contained in G.S. 105-164.14 and G.S. 105-164.14A
apply to the local sales and use tax authorized to be levied and imposed under this Article. A
refund of an excessive or erroneous State sales tax collection allowed under G.S. 105-164.11 and
a refund of State sales tax paid on a rescinded sale or cancelled service contract under
G.S. 105-164.11A apply to the local sales and use tax authorized to be levied and imposed under
this Article. The aggregate annual local refund amount allowed an entity under
G.S. 105-164.14(b) for the State's fiscal year may not exceed thirteen million three hundred
thousand dollars ($13,300,000).
Except as provided in this subsection, a taxing county may not allow an exemption, exclusion,
or refund that is not allowed under the State sales and use tax. A local school administrative unit
and a joint agency created by interlocal agreement among local school administrative units
pursuant to G.S. 160A-462 to jointly purchase food service-related materials, supplies, and
equipment on their behalf is allowed an annual refund of sales and use taxes paid by it under this
Article on direct purchases of items. Sales and use tax liability indirectly incurred by the entity
as part of a real property contract for real property that is owned or leased by the entity and is a
capital improvement for use by the entity is considered a sales or use tax liability incurred on
direct purchases by the entity for the purpose of this subsection. The refund allowed under this
subsection does not apply to purchases of electricity, telecommunications service, ancillary
service, piped natural gas, video programming, or a prepaid meal plan. A request for a refund is
Page 2 Senate Bill 1029-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
due in the same time and manner as provided in G.S. 105-164.14(c). Refunds applied for more
than three years after the due date are barred.
…."
SECTION 5. G.S. 105-164.3(15) reads as rewritten:
"(15) Amenity. – A feature that increases the value or attractiveness of an
entertainment activity that allows a person access to items that are not subject
to tax under this Article and that are not available with the purchase of
admission to the same event without the feature. The term includes parking
privileges, special entrances, access to areas other than general admission,
mascot visits, and merchandise discounts. The term does not include any
charge for food, prepared food, and food or alcoholic beverages subject to tax
under this Article."
SECTION 6. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the North Carolina
Association of Regional Councils of Governments the sum of one million six hundred thousand
dollars ($1,600,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be equally allocated
to each regional council of government in the State and used by the regional councils to educate
their constituents on the availability of tax relief.
SECTION 7. Sections 1 through 5 of this act become effective October 1, 2026, and
applies to sales made on or after that date. Section 6 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Senate Bill 1029-First Edition Page 3